searchsrv/searchengine/oss/sb/snowball/algorithms/turkish/stem_Unicode.sbl
	// does not fully obey vowel harmony	
	define mark_ysA as (
		among ('sam' 'san' 'sak' 'sem' 'sen' 'sek' 'sa' 'se')
		(mark_suffix_with_optional_y_consonant)
	)
	
	define mark_ymUs_ as (
		check_vowel_harmony
		among ('m{i'}{s.}' 'mi{s.}' 'mu{s.}' 'm{u"}{s.}')
		(mark_suffix_with_optional_y_consonant)
	)
	
	define mark_yken as (
		'ken' (mark_suffix_with_optional_y_consonant)
	)
	
	define stem_nominal_verb_suffixes as (
		[	
			set continue_stemming_noun_suffixes
			(mark_ymUs_ or mark_yDU or mark_ysA or mark_yken)
			or
			(mark_cAsInA (mark_sUnUz or mark_lAr or mark_yUm or mark_sUn or mark_yUz or true) mark_ymUs_)
			or
			(
				mark_lAr ] delete try([(mark_DUr or mark_yDU or mark_ysA or mark_ymUs_))
				unset continue_stemming_noun_suffixes
			)
			or
			(mark_nUz (mark_yDU or mark_ysA))
			or
			((mark_sUnUz or mark_yUz or mark_sUn or mark_yUm) ] delete try([ mark_ymUs_))
			or
			(mark_DUr ] delete try([ (mark_sUnUz or mark_lAr or mark_yUm or mark_sUn or mark_yUz or true) mark_ymUs_))
		]delete
	)
	
	// stems noun suffix chains ending with -ki
	define stem_suffix_chain_before_ki as (
		[
			mark_ki
			(
				(mark_DA] delete try([
					(mark_lAr] delete try(stem_suffix_chain_before_ki))
					or
					(mark_possessives] delete try([mark_lAr] delete stem_suffix_chain_before_ki))
					
				))
				or
				(mark_nUn] delete try([
					(mark_lArI] delete)
					or
					([mark_possessives or mark_sU] delete try([mark_lAr] delete stem_suffix_chain_before_ki))
					or
					(stem_suffix_chain_before_ki)
				))
				or
				(mark_ndA (	
					(mark_lArI] delete)
					or
					((mark_sU] delete try([mark_lAr]delete stem_suffix_chain_before_ki)))
					or
					(stem_suffix_chain_before_ki)
				))
			)
	)
	
	define stem_noun_suffixes as (
		([mark_lAr] delete try(stem_suffix_chain_before_ki))
		or
		([mark_ncA] delete
			try(
				([mark_lArI] delete)
				or
				([mark_possessives or mark_sU] delete try([mark_lAr] delete stem_suffix_chain_before_ki))
				or
				([mark_lAr] delete stem_suffix_chain_before_ki)
			)
		)
		or
		([(mark_ndA or mark_nA)
			(
		  		(mark_lArI] delete)
		  		or
		  		(mark_sU] delete try([mark_lAr] delete stem_suffix_chain_before_ki))
		  		or
		  		(stem_suffix_chain_before_ki)
		  	)
		)
		or
		([(mark_ndAn or mark_nU) ((mark_sU ] delete try([mark_lAr] delete stem_suffix_chain_before_ki)) or (mark_lArI)))
		or
		( [mark_DAn] delete try ([
			(
		 		(mark_possessives ] delete try([mark_lAr] delete stem_suffix_chain_before_ki))
		 		or
		 		(mark_lAr] delete try(stem_suffix_chain_before_ki))
		 		or
		 		(stem_suffix_chain_before_ki)
		 	))
		)
		or
		([mark_nUn or mark_ylA] delete
			try(
				([mark_lAr] delete stem_suffix_chain_before_ki)
				or
				([mark_possessives or mark_sU] delete try([mark_lAr] delete stem_suffix_chain_before_ki))
				or
				stem_suffix_chain_before_ki
			)
		)
		or
		([mark_lArI] delete)
		or	
		(stem_suffix_chain_before_ki)
		or
		([mark_DA or mark_yU or mark_yA] delete try([((mark_possessives] delete try([mark_lAr)) or mark_lAr) ] delete [ stem_suffix_chain_before_ki))
		or
		([mark_possessives or mark_sU] delete try([mark_lAr] delete stem_suffix_chain_before_ki))
	)
	
	define post_process_last_consonants as (	
		[substring] among (
			'b' (<- 'p')
			'c' (<- '{c.}')
			'd' (<- 't')
			'{g~}' (<- 'k')
		)
	)

	// after stemming if the word ends with 'd' or 'g' most probably last U is overstemmed
	// like in 'kedim' -> 'ked'
	// Turkish words don't usually end with 'd' or 'g'
	// some very well known words are ignored (like 'ad' 'soyad'	
	// appends U to stems ending with d or g, decides which vowel to add
	// based on the last vowel in the stem
	define append_U_to_stems_ending_with_d_or_g as (
		test('d' or 'g')
		(test((goto vowel) 'a' or '{i'}') <+ '{i'}')
		or
		(test((goto vowel) 'e' or 'i') <+ 'i')
		or
		(test((goto vowel) 'o' or 'u') <+ 'u')
		or
		(test((goto vowel) '{o"}' or '{u"}') <+ '{u"}')
	)
	
)

// Tests if there are more than one syllables
// In Turkish each vowel indicates a distinct syllable
define more_than_one_syllable_word as (
	test (atleast 2 (gopast vowel))
)

define is_reserved_word as (
	test(gopast 'ad' ($strlen = 2) ($strlen == limit))
	or
	test(gopast 'soyad' ($strlen = 5) ($strlen == limit))
)

define postlude as (
	not(is_reserved_word)
	backwards (
		do append_U_to_stems_ending_with_d_or_g
		do post_process_last_consonants
		
	)
)

define stem as (
	(more_than_one_syllable_word)
	(
		backwards (
			do stem_nominal_verb_suffixes
			continue_stemming_noun_suffixes
			do stem_noun_suffixes
		)
		
	postlude
	)
)
